North Carolina statutes. Chapter 146. State Lands.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 146-1.
Intent of Subchapter.

It is the purpose and intent of this Subchapter to vest in the Department of Administration, subject to rules and regulations adopted by the Governor and approved by the Council of State as hereinafter provided, responsibility for the management, control and disposition of all vacant and unappropriated lands, swamplands, lands acquired by the State by virtue of being sold for taxes, and submerged lands, title to which is vested in the State or in any State agency, to be exercised subject to the provisions of this Subchapter.

Further, it is the intent of this Subchapter to establish within the Department, a method for obtaining easements for State-owned lands covered by navigable waters that includes compensation, recognizes the common law rights of riparian or littoral property owners, and balances those rights with the State’s obligation to protect public trust rights for all of its citizens. The North Carolina General Assembly finds that the State is unable to provide the necessary access for its citizens to exercise public trust rights and, therefore, recognizes the role that publicly and privately owned piers, docks, wharves, marinas, and other structures located in or over State-owned lands covered by navigable waters generally serve in furthering public trust purposes including:

Providing citizens with access and ability to exercise public trust boating, fishing, and swimming activities;

Enhancing the value of appurtenant upland property values with the resulting increased collection of ad valorem taxes;

Enhancing tourism which is essential to the economy of the State and, in particular, to the coastal counties; and

Increasing local participation in boating and fishing activities with the resulting increase in taxes paid for fuel, fishing tackle, boat equipment, and imported boats and motors which taxes contribute to the sound economy of the State, and some of which are paid into the federal Wallop-Breaux Fund for redistribution to the State for water resource enhancements and water access improvements.

Nothing in this Subchapter shall apply to a privately owned lake or any hydroelectric reservoir licensed by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.

Nothing in this Subchapter shall be construed to limit or expand the full exercise of common law riparian or littoral rights.

History.

1959, c. 683, s. 1; 1995, c. 529, s. 1.

Local Modification.

(As to Chapter 146) Orange: 2016-98, ss. 2.1, 2.2 (lease agreement to facilitate Orange County jail construction).

Oregon Inlet State Park and Outer Banks Transportation Corridor.

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 14.7(a)-(h), authorizes the initiation of negotiations by the Department of Administration with the appropriate federal authority for the acquisition of certain federally owned property for the creation of Oregon Inlet State Park. If the subject real property is acquired by the State, then, together with any other real property owned by the State within the subject area, the Department of Environment and Natural Resources is authorized to add Oregon Inlet State Park to the State Parks System. The provisions of Session Laws 2014-100, s. 14.7(a)-(h), further provides for the condemnation authority necessary to manage existing and future transportation corridors on the Outer Banks, and for the identification of federally owned property necessary to construct or manage existing and future transportation corridors on the Outer Banks.

§ 146-2.
Department of Administration given control of certain State lands; general powers.

The power to manage, control, and dispose of the vacant and unappropriated lands, swamplands, lands acquired by the State by virtue of being sold for taxes, and submerged lands is hereby vested in the Department of Administration, subject to rules and regulations adopted by the Governor and approved by the Council of State, and subject to the provisions of this Subchapter. The Department of Administration shall have the following general powers and duties with respect to those lands:

To take such measures as it deems necessary to establish, protect, preserve, and enhance the interest of the State in those lands, and to call upon the Attorney General for legal assistance in performing this duty.

Subject to the approval of the Governor and Council of State, to adopt such rules and regulations at it may deem necessary to carry out its duties under the provisions of this Subchapter.

History.

1959, c. 683, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Battle to Preserve North Carolina’s Estuarine Marshes: The 1985 Legislation, Private Claims to Estuarine Marshes, Denial of Permits to Fill, and the Public Trust,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 565 (1986).